Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.225.220

Adults, children from other districts, agreements for attending school—Tuition.

(1) Any board of directors may make agreements with adults choosing to attend school, and may charge the adults reasonable tuition.

(2) A district is strongly encouraged to honor the request of a parent or guardian for his or her child to attend a school in another district or the request of a parent or guardian for his or her child to transfer as a student receiving home-based instruction.

(3) A district shall release a student to a nonresident district that agrees to accept the student if:

(a) A financial, educational, safety, or health condition affecting the student would likely be reasonably improved as a result of the transfer; or

(b) Attendance at the school in the nonresident district is more accessible to the parent's place of work or to the location of child care; or

(c) There is a special hardship or detrimental condition; or

(d) The purpose of the transfer is for the student to enroll in an online course or online school program offered by an online provider approved under RCW 28A.250.020.

(4) A district may deny the request of a resident student to transfer to a nonresident district if the release of the student would adversely affect the district's existing desegregation plan.

(5) For the purpose of helping a district assess the quality of its education program, a resident school district may request an optional exit interview or questionnaire with the parents or guardians of a child transferring to another district. No parent or guardian may be forced to attend such an interview or complete the questionnaire.

(6) Beginning with the 1993-94 school year, school districts may not charge transfer fees or tuition for nonresident students enrolled under subsection (3) of this section and RCW 28A.225.225. Reimbursement of a high school district for cost of educating high school pupils of a nonhigh school district shall not be deemed a transfer fee as affecting the apportionment of current state school funds.

[ 2013 2nd sp.s. c 18 s 510. Prior: 1995 c 335 s 602; 1995 c 52 s 2; 1993 c 336 s 1008; 1990 1st ex.s. c 9 s 201; 1969 c 130 s 10; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.58.240; prior: 1963 c 47 s 2; prior: 1921 c 44 s 1, part; 1899 c 142 s 8, part; RRS s 4780, part. Formerly RCW 28A.58.240, 28.58.240.]

NOTES:

Application—Enforcement of laws protecting health and safety—2013 2nd sp.s. c 18: See note following RCW 28A.600.022.

Part headings, table of contents not law—1995 c 335: See note following RCW 28A.150.360.

Findings—Intent—Part headings not law—1993 c 336: See notes following RCW 28A.150.210.

Findings—1993 c 336: See note following RCW 28A.150.210.

Finding—1990 1st ex.s. c 9: "The legislature finds that academic achievement of Washington students can and should be improved. The legislature further finds that student success depends, in large part, on increased parental involvement in their children's education.

In order to take another step toward improving education in Washington, it is the purpose of this act to enhance the ability of parents to exercise choice in where they prefer their children attend school; inform parents of their options under local policies and state law for the intradistrict and interdistrict enrollment of their children; and provide additional program opportunities for secondary students." [ 1990 1st ex.s. c 9 s 101.]

Severability—1990 1st ex.s. c 9: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1990 1st ex.s. c 9 s 502.]

Education of children with disabilities: RCW 28A.155.040, 28A.155.050.